tables/lo-g1.utb
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EB6\x0EC8\x0EAD 125-12345-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EB6\x0EC9\x0EAD 125-12345-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EB6\x0ECA\x0EAD 125-12345-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EB6\x0ECB\x0EAD 125-12345-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0EAD\x0EB6\x0EAD 135-12345-1
always \x0EC0\x0EAD\x0EB6\x0EC8\x0EAD 135-12345-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAD\x0EB6\x0EC9\x0EAD 135-12345-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAD\x0EB6\x0ECA\x0EAD 135-12345-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAD\x0EB6\x0ECB\x0EAD 135-12345-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0EAE\x0EB6\x0EAD 123456-12345-1
always \x0EC0\x0EAE\x0EB6\x0EC8\x0EAD 123456-12345-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAE\x0EB6\x0EC9\x0EAD 123456-12345-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAE\x0EB6\x0ECA\x0EAD 123456-12345-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAE\x0EB6\x0ECB\x0EAD 123456-12345-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0EDC\x0EB6\x0EAD 6-1345-12345-1
always \x0EC0\x0EDC\x0EB6\x0EC8\x0EAD 6-1345-12345-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0EDC\x0EB6\x0EC9\x0EAD 6-1345-12345-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0EDC\x0EB6\x0ECA\x0EAD 6-1345-12345-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EDC\x0EB6\x0ECB\x0EAD 6-1345-12345-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0EDD\x0EB6\x0EAD 6-134-12345-1
always \x0EC0\x0EDD\x0EB6\x0EC8\x0EAD 6-134-12345-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0EDD\x0EB6\x0EC9\x0EAD 6-134-12345-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0EDD\x0EB6\x0ECA\x0EAD 6-134-12345-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EDD\x0EB6\x0ECB\x0EAD 6-134-12345-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EBC\x0EB6\x0EAD 125-3-12345-1
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EBC\x0EB6\x0EC8\x0EAD 125-3-12345-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EBC\x0EB6\x0EC9\x0EAD 125-3-12345-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EBC\x0EB6\x0ECA\x0EAD 125-3-12345-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EBC\x0EB6\x0ECB\x0EAD 125-3-12345-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E87\x0EB6\x0EAD 125-12456-12345-1
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E87\x0EB6\x0EC8\x0EAD 125-12456-12345-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E87\x0EB6\x0EC9\x0EAD 125-12456-12345-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E87\x0EB6\x0ECA\x0EAD 125-12456-12345-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E87\x0EB6\x0ECB\x0EAD 125-12456-12345-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E8D\x0EB6\x0EAD 125-13456-12345-1
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E8D\x0EB6\x0EC8\x0EAD 125-13456-12345-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E8D\x0EB6\x0EC9\x0EAD 125-13456-12345-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E8D\x0EB6\x0ECA\x0EAD 125-13456-12345-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E8D\x0EB6\x0ECB\x0EAD 125-13456-12345-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E99\x0EB6\x0EAD 125-1345-12345-1
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E99\x0EB6\x0EC8\x0EAD 125-1345-12345-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E99\x0EB6\x0EC9\x0EAD 125-1345-12345-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E99\x0EB6\x0ECA\x0EAD 125-1345-12345-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E99\x0EB6\x0ECB\x0EAD 125-1345-12345-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA5\x0EB6\x0EAD 125-123-12345-1
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA5\x0EB6\x0EC8\x0EAD 125-123-12345-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA5\x0EB6\x0EC9\x0EAD 125-123-12345-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA5\x0EB6\x0ECA\x0EAD 125-123-12345-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA5\x0EB6\x0ECB\x0EAD 125-123-12345-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA7\x0EB6\x0EAD 125-2456-12345-1
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA7\x0EB6\x0EC8\x0EAD 125-2456-12345-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA7\x0EB6\x0EC9\x0EAD 125-2456-12345-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA7\x0EB6\x0ECA\x0EAD 125-2456-12345-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA7\x0EB6\x0ECB\x0EAD 125-2456-12345-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA1\x0EB6\x0EAD 125-134-12345-1
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA1\x0EB6\x0EC8\x0EAD 125-134-12345-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA1\x0EB6\x0EC9\x0EAD 125-134-12345-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA1\x0EB6\x0ECA\x0EAD 125-134-12345-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA1\x0EB6\x0ECB\x0EAD 125-134-12345-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0EA7\x0EB6\x0EAD 1245-2456-12345-1
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0EA7\x0EB6\x0EC8\x0EAD 1245-2456-12345-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0EA7\x0EB6\x0EC9\x0EAD 1245-2456-12345-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0EA7\x0EB6\x0ECA\x0EAD 1245-2456-12345-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0EA7\x0EB6\x0ECB\x0EAD 1245-2456-12345-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EA7\x0EB6\x0EAD 13-2456-12345-1
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EA7\x0EB6\x0EC8\x0EAD 13-2456-12345-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EA7\x0EB6\x0EC9\x0EAD 13-2456-12345-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EA7\x0EB6\x0ECA\x0EAD 13-2456-12345-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EA7\x0EB6\x0ECB\x0EAD 13-2456-12345-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EA7\x0EB6\x0EAD 136-2456-12345-1
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EA7\x0EB6\x0EC8\x0EAD 136-2456-12345-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EA7\x0EB6\x0EC9\x0EAD 136-2456-12345-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EA7\x0EB6\x0ECA\x0EAD 136-2456-12345-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EA7\x0EB6\x0ECB\x0EAD 136-2456-12345-1-236
# ue vowels
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0EB7\x0EAD 1245-12345
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0EB7\x0EC8\x0EAD 1245-12345-35
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0EB7\x0EC9\x0EAD 1245-12345-256
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0EB7\x0ECA\x0EAD 1245-12345-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0EB7\x0ECB\x0EAD 1245-12345-236
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EB7\x0EAD 13-12345
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EB7\x0EC8\x0EAD 13-12345-35
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EB7\x0EC9\x0EAD 13-12345-256
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EB7\x0ECA\x0EAD 13-12345-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EB7\x0ECB\x0EAD 13-12345-236
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EB7\x0EAD 136-12345
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EB7\x0EC8\x0EAD 136-12345-35
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EB7\x0EC9\x0EAD 136-12345-256
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EB7\x0ECA\x0EAD 136-12345-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EB7\x0ECB\x0EAD 136-12345-236
always \x0EC0\x0E87\x0EB7\x0EAD 12456-12345
always \x0EC0\x0E87\x0EB7\x0EC8\x0EAD 12456-12345-35
always \x0EC0\x0E87\x0EB7\x0EC9\x0EAD 12456-12345-256
always \x0EC0\x0E87\x0EB7\x0ECA\x0EAD 12456-12345-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E87\x0EB7\x0ECB\x0EAD 12456-12345-236
always \x0EC0\x0E88\x0EB7\x0EAD 245-12345
always \x0EC0\x0E88\x0EB7\x0EC8\x0EAD 245-12345-35
always \x0EC0\x0E88\x0EB7\x0EC9\x0EAD 245-12345-256
always \x0EC0\x0E88\x0EB7\x0ECA\x0EAD 245-12345-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E88\x0EB7\x0ECB\x0EAD 245-12345-236	
always \x0EC0\x0EAA\x0EB7\x0EAD 234-12345
always \x0EC0\x0EAA\x0EB7\x0EC8\x0EAD 234-12345-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAA\x0EB7\x0EC9\x0EAD 234-12345-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAA\x0EB7\x0ECA\x0EAD 234-12345-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAA\x0EB7\x0ECB\x0EAD 234-12345-236
always \x0EC0\x0E8A\x0EB7\x0EAD 2346-12345
always \x0EC0\x0E8A\x0EB7\x0EC8\x0EAD 2346-12345-35
always \x0EC0\x0E8A\x0EB7\x0EC9\x0EAD 2346-12345-256
always \x0EC0\x0E8A\x0EB7\x0ECA\x0EAD 2346-12345-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E8A\x0EB7\x0ECB\x0EAD 2346-12345-236
always \x0EC0\x0E8D\x0EB7\x0EAD 13456-12345
always \x0EC0\x0E8D\x0EB7\x0EC8\x0EAD 13456-12345-35
always \x0EC0\x0E8D\x0EB7\x0EC9\x0EAD 13456-12345-256
always \x0EC0\x0E8D\x0EB7\x0ECA\x0EAD 13456-12345-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E8D\x0EB7\x0ECB\x0EAD 13456-12345-236
always \x0EC0\x0E94\x0EB7\x0EAD 145-12345
always \x0EC0\x0E94\x0EB7\x0EC8\x0EAD 145-12345-35
always \x0EC0\x0E94\x0EB7\x0EC9\x0EAD 145-12345-256
always \x0EC0\x0E94\x0EB7\x0ECA\x0EAD 145-12345-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E94\x0EB7\x0ECB\x0EAD 145-12345-236
always \x0EC0\x0E95\x0EB7\x0EAD 1256-12345
always \x0EC0\x0E95\x0EB7\x0EC8\x0EAD 1256-12345-35
always \x0EC0\x0E95\x0EB7\x0EC9\x0EAD 1256-12345-256
always \x0EC0\x0E95\x0EB7\x0ECA\x0EAD 1256-12345-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E95\x0EB7\x0ECB\x0EAD 1256-12345-236
always \x0EC0\x0E96\x0EB7\x0EAD 2345-12345
always \x0EC0\x0E96\x0EB7\x0EC8\x0EAD 2345-12345-35
always \x0EC0\x0E96\x0EB7\x0EC9\x0EAD 2345-12345-256
always \x0EC0\x0E96\x0EB7\x0ECA\x0EAD 2345-12345-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E96\x0EB7\x0ECB\x0EAD 2345-12345-236
always \x0EC0\x0E97\x0EB7\x0EAD 23456-12345
always \x0EC0\x0E97\x0EB7\x0EC8\x0EAD 23456-12345-35
always \x0EC0\x0E97\x0EB7\x0EC9\x0EAD 23456-12345-256
always \x0EC0\x0E97\x0EB7\x0ECA\x0EAD 23456-12345-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E97\x0EB7\x0ECB\x0EAD 23456-12345-236
always \x0EC0\x0E99\x0EB7\x0EAD 1345-12345
always \x0EC0\x0E99\x0EB7\x0EC8\x0EAD 1345-12345-35
always \x0EC0\x0E99\x0EB7\x0EC9\x0EAD 1345-12345-256
always \x0EC0\x0E99\x0EB7\x0ECA\x0EAD 1345-12345-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E99\x0EB7\x0ECB\x0EAD 1345-12345-236
always \x0EC0\x0E9A\x0EB7\x0EAD 1236-12345
always \x0EC0\x0E9A\x0EB7\x0EC8\x0EAD 1236-12345-35
always \x0EC0\x0E9A\x0EB7\x0EC9\x0EAD 1236-12345-256
always \x0EC0\x0E9A\x0EB7\x0ECA\x0EAD 1236-12345-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E9A\x0EB7\x0ECB\x0EAD 1236-12345-236
always \x0EC0\x0E9B\x0EB7\x0EAD 12346-12345
always \x0EC0\x0E9B\x0EB7\x0EC8\x0EAD 12346-12345-35
always \x0EC0\x0E9B\x0EB7\x0EC9\x0EAD 12346-12345-256
always \x0EC0\x0E9B\x0EB7\x0ECA\x0EAD 12346-12345-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E9B\x0EB7\x0ECB\x0EAD 12346-12345-236
always \x0EC0\x0E9C\x0EB7\x0EAD 1234-12345
always \x0EC0\x0E9C\x0EB7\x0EC8\x0EAD 1234-12345-35
always \x0EC0\x0E9C\x0EB7\x0EC9\x0EAD 1234-12345-256
always \x0EC0\x0E9C\x0EB7\x0ECA\x0EAD 1234-12345-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E9C\x0EB7\x0ECB\x0EAD 1234-12345-236
always \x0EC0\x0E9D\x0EB7\x0EAD 1346-12345
always \x0EC0\x0E9D\x0EB7\x0EC8\x0EAD 1346-12345-35
always \x0EC0\x0E9D\x0EB7\x0EC9\x0EAD 1346-12345-256
always \x0EC0\x0E9D\x0EB7\x0ECA\x0EAD 1346-12345-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E9D\x0EB7\x0ECB\x0EAD 1346-12345-236
always \x0EC0\x0E9E\x0EB7\x0EAD 1456-12345
always \x0EC0\x0E9E\x0EB7\x0EC8\x0EAD 1456-12345-35
always \x0EC0\x0E9E\x0EB7\x0EC9\x0EAD 1456-12345-256
always \x0EC0\x0E9E\x0EB7\x0ECA\x0EAD 1456-12345-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E9E\x0EB7\x0ECB\x0EAD 1456-12345-236
always \x0EC0\x0E9F\x0EB7\x0EAD 1246-12345
always \x0EC0\x0E9F\x0EB7\x0EC8\x0EAD 1246-12345-35
always \x0EC0\x0E9F\x0EB7\x0EC9\x0EAD 1246-12345-256
always \x0EC0\x0E9F\x0EB7\x0ECA\x0EAD 1246-12345-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E9F\x0EB7\x0ECB\x0EAD 1246-12345-236
always \x0EC0\x0EA1\x0EB7\x0EAD 134-12345
always \x0EC0\x0EA1\x0EB7\x0EC8\x0EAD 134-12345-35
always \x0EC0\x0EA1\x0EB7\x0EC9\x0EAD 134-12345-256
always \x0EC0\x0EA1\x0EB7\x0ECA\x0EAD 134-12345-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EA1\x0EB7\x0ECB\x0EAD 134-12345-236
always \x0EC0\x0EA2\x0EB7\x0EAD 6-13456-12345
always \x0EC0\x0EA2\x0EB7\x0EC8\x0EAD 6-13456-12345-35
always \x0EC0\x0EA2\x0EB7\x0EC9\x0EAD 6-13456-12345-256
always \x0EC0\x0EA2\x0EB7\x0ECA\x0EAD 6-13456-12345-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EA2\x0EB7\x0ECB\x0EAD 6-13456-12345-236
always \x0EC0\x0EA5\x0EB7\x0EAD 123-12345
always \x0EC0\x0EA5\x0EB7\x0EC8\x0EAD 123-12345-35
always \x0EC0\x0EA5\x0EB7\x0EC9\x0EAD 123-12345-256
always \x0EC0\x0EA5\x0EB7\x0ECA\x0EAD 123-12345-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EA5\x0EB7\x0ECB\x0EAD 123-12345-236
always \x0EC0\x0EA3\x0EB7\x0EAD 1235-12345
always \x0EC0\x0EA3\x0EB7\x0EC8\x0EAD 1235-12345-35
always \x0EC0\x0EA3\x0EB7\x0EC9\x0EAD 1235-12345-256
always \x0EC0\x0EA3\x0EB7\x0ECA\x0EAD 1235-12345-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EA3\x0EB7\x0ECB\x0EAD 1235-12345-236
always \x0EC0\x0EA7\x0EB7\x0EAD 2456-12345
always \x0EC0\x0EA7\x0EB7\x0EC8\x0EAD 2456-12345-35
always \x0EC0\x0EA7\x0EB7\x0EC9\x0EAD 2456-12345-256
always \x0EC0\x0EA7\x0EB7\x0ECA\x0EAD 2456-12345-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EA7\x0EB7\x0ECB\x0EAD 2456-12345-236
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EB7\x0EAD 125-12345
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EB7\x0EC8\x0EAD 125-12345-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EB7\x0EC9\x0EAD 125-12345-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EB7\x0ECA\x0EAD 125-12345-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EB7\x0ECB\x0EAD 125-12345-236
always \x0EC0\x0EAD\x0EB7\x0EAD 135-12345
always \x0EC0\x0EAD\x0EB7\x0EC8\x0EAD 135-12345-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAD\x0EB7\x0EC9\x0EAD 135-12345-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAD\x0EB7\x0ECA\x0EAD 135-12345-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAD\x0EB7\x0ECB\x0EAD 135-12345-236
always \x0EC0\x0EAE\x0EB7\x0EAD 123456-12345
always \x0EC0\x0EAE\x0EB7\x0EC8\x0EAD 123456-12345-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAE\x0EB7\x0EC9\x0EAD 123456-12345-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAE\x0EB7\x0ECA\x0EAD 123456-12345-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAE\x0EB7\x0ECB\x0EAD 123456-12345-236
always \x0EC0\x0EDC\x0EB7\x0EAD 6-1345-12345
always \x0EC0\x0EDC\x0EB7\x0EC8\x0EAD 6-1345-12345-35
always \x0EC0\x0EDC\x0EB7\x0EC9\x0EAD 6-1345-12345-256
always \x0EC0\x0EDC\x0EB7\x0ECA\x0EAD 6-1345-12345-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EDC\x0EB7\x0ECB\x0EAD 6-1345-12345-236
always \x0EC0\x0EDD\x0EB7\x0EAD 6-134-12345
always \x0EC0\x0EDD\x0EB7\x0EC8\x0EAD 6-134-12345-35
always \x0EC0\x0EDD\x0EB7\x0EC9\x0EAD 6-134-12345-256
always \x0EC0\x0EDD\x0EB7\x0ECA\x0EAD 6-134-12345-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EDD\x0EB7\x0ECB\x0EAD 6-134-12345-236
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EBC\x0EB7\x0EAD 125-3-12345
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EBC\x0EB7\x0EC8\x0EAD 125-3-12345-35
